District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0003.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act may be
cited as the “Rent Stabilized Housing Inflation Protection Continuation Temporary Amendment
Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Title II of the Rental Housing Act of 1985, effective July 17, 1985 (D.C. Law 6-10;
D.C. Official Code § 42-3502.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 208 (D.C. Official Code § 42-3502.08) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (h)(2) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (A) is amended as follows:
(i) The existing text is designated as sub-subparagraph (i).
(ii) A new sub-subparagraph (ii) is added to read as follows:
“(ii) Notwithstanding the provisions of sub-subparagraph (i) of this
subparagraph, adjustments that take effect from July 1, 2023, through April 30, 2025, shall not
exceed the current allowable amount of rent charged for the unit, plus the adjustment of general
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
applicability plus 2%, taken as a percentage of the current allowable amount of rent charged;
provided, that the total adjustment shall not exceed 6%;”.
(B) Subparagraph (C) is amended as follows:
(i) The existing text is designated as sub-subparagraph (i).
(ii) A new sub-subparagraph (ii) is added to read as follows:
“(ii) Notwithstanding sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph,
adjustments that take effect from July 1, 2023, through April 30, 2025, shall not exceed the current
allowable amount of rent charged for the unit plus the lesser of 4% or the adjustment of general
applicability if the unit is leased or co-leased by a home and community-based services waiver
provider.”.
(2) New subsections (i) and (j) are added to read as follows:
“(i)(1) Notwithstanding section 904(b), any notices of rent increases issued pursuant to
subsection (h)(2) of this section for which the rent increase shall be effective on or after July 1,
2023, may be re-noticed with less than 30 days’ notice if the rent increase is lower than the rent
increase in the original notice.”.
“(2) Any payment of rent in excess of the legal allowable rent charged that was
made in accordance with notices of rent increases issued prior to the effective date of this act shall
be repaid to the payer within 30 days after overpayment or by August 1, 2023, whichever is later.
“(j) Notwithstanding subsection (h)(2) of this section, the total amount of adjustments from
May 1, 2023, through April 30, 2025, shall not exceed the legal rent charged on April 30, 2023, for
the unit plus:
“(1) 8%, if the unit is occupied by an elderly tenant or tenant with a disability, or if
the unit is leased or co-leased by a home and community-based services waiver provider; or
“(2) 12%, if the unit is occupied by any other tenant.”.
(b) Section 224 (D.C. Official Code § 42-3502.24) is amended by adding a new subsection
(a-1) to read as follows:
“(a-1) Notwithstanding section 208(h) or subsection (a) of this section, an adjustment that
takes effect from July 1, 2023, through April 30, 2025, in the amount of rent charged while a unit is
occupied by an elderly tenant or tenant with a disability, without regard to income, shall not exceed
the rent charged for the unit, plus the least of:
“(1) The adjustment of general applicability;
“(2) The most recent annual cost-of-living adjustment of benefits for social security
recipients established pursuant to section 215(i) of the Social Security Act, approved August 28,
1950 (64 Stat. 506; 42 U.S.C. § 415(i)); or
“(3) 4% of the rent charged.”.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
This act shall apply as of January 12, 2025.
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24,
1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
3